Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Temporary Assistance
71-3-108. Modifications to program — Federal waivers.

The commissioner of human services is authorized, pursuant to the requirements of subsections (b) and (c), to immediately implement changes necessary as a result of federal legislation designed to reform welfare programs that are, or may be in the future, administered by the department of human services or other appropriate state agencies.

It is the intent of the general assembly that any modifications to the state's welfare programs be implemented that are required by federal law or that are necessary to ensure or enhance federal funding of the state's welfare programs or that are necessary for the implementation of such changes. Acting in accordance with § 4-5-108, the department shall have authority to immediately implement any federal legislative changes by emergency rules; provided, that permanent rules shall be promulgated pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For purposes of this section, “welfare program” is defined as any federal or state means-tested program administered by the department of human services, or any child support enforcement program administered by the department of human services pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Act authorized by P.L. 101-392 [repealed], and the Adult Education Act, authorized by P.L. 100-297 [repealed], as amended by the National Literacy Act of 1991, P.L. 102-73 [repealed].

The commissioner of human services is authorized to seek and to implement waivers to carry out this part and chapter 5, part 12 of this title to the extent permitted by federal authorities.

If waivers that are necessary to implement any or all of the provisions of this part, chapter 3, parts 9 and 10 and chapter 5, part 12 of this title cannot be obtained, or in those counties for which the continued operation of the existing welfare program may be required by the federal authorities for the evaluation of any waivers granted by the federal government, the department shall continue to administer, pursuant to the requirements of federal statutes and regulations, the federally funded programs of economic or welfare assistance to families and children under Titles IV-A and IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), respectively, as they may continue to exist on or after September 1, 1996, until such time as such programs may be terminated or modified by the congress of the United States, the United States department of health and human services or its successor, or the general assembly.

If at any time:

The congress of the United States terminates or modifies the Title IV-A block grant program for federally funded economic or welfare assistance to families and children to the states under the temporary assistance to needy families program (TANF) as provided in Public Law 104-193 (1996) (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), as amended;

The congress of the United States, or the United States department of health and human services or its successor terminates, or modifies, Tennessee's Section 1115 waiver obtained pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) on July 26, 1996, that resulted in the creation of the families first program; or

In the future, action by congress, or by the United States department of health and human services or its successor, terminates or modifies any subsequent federally funded economic or welfare assistance program or any waiver that may be obtained for the operation of such a program for families and children, or a waiver that may be obtained for a welfare program demonstration project;

Then, in that circumstance, the department shall continue to administer, pursuant to the requirements of federal statutes and regulations existing at that time or subsequently enacted, the programs of economic or welfare assistance to families and children under Titles IV-A and IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), respectively, as they may continue to exist on or after the date of such termination or modification or until the granting of a new waiver, and this part, chapter 3, parts 9 and 10 and chapter 5, part 12 of this title shall be superseded to the extent:

Those provisions are inconsistent with any federal requirements for which no waiver exists; or

No further federal funding is available, unless the general assembly specifically authorizes and funds the continuation of such provisions that do not otherwise conflict with federal law, regulation or waiver requirements.

The termination or modification of any federally funded programs for the economic assistance to families and children shall not result in any entitlement to funding by the state of Tennessee for such programs pursuant to this part, chapter 3, parts, 9 and 10 and chapter 5, part 12 of this title, or otherwise, unless appropriations are made in the appropriations act specifically for such purpose.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department shall have authority to implement any rules, by emergency rule, that are necessary to:

Maintain compliance with such terminations or modifications;

Maintain federal funding;

Comply with any federal regulation that has not been waived; or

Comply with any waiver requirements;

provided, however, that the department shall promulgate permanent rules pursuant to a rulemaking hearing as required by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Child support received by the department with respect to recipients of temporary assistance shall be passed on to the recipient in the same manner as was the practice of the department prior to July 1, 1996, with respect to recipients of aid to families with dependent children (AFDC). However, the department shall not be required to pass through any portion of child support that by federal law must be paid to the federal government. The department shall seek any available waiver from a requirement that any portion of child support must be paid to the federal government, and, if a waiver is granted, pass the support through to the recipient of temporary assistance as required in this subsection (e).

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 9; 2003, ch. 119, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; T.C.A., §71-3-158.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-158 was transferred to §71-3-108 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

The Adult Education Act, referred to in this section, formerly compiled in 20 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq., was repealed effective August 7, 1998. The National Literacy Act of 1991, referred to in this section, was repealed August 7, 1998.

The Section 1115 waiver, referred to in this section, refers to Section 1115 of the Social Security Act, codified in 42 U.S.C. § 1315.

The Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Act, referred to in this section, formerly compiled in 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et seq., was replaced by general amendment.

Attorney General Opinions. The Department of Human Services may not promulgate public necessity rules (now emergency rules) to revise and/or update existing Families First program regulations as part of a general program re-design necessary to maintain federal funding, OAG 07-09, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (1/25/07).

71-3-109. Diversion grants.

Except for a child-only grant for temporary assistance, the department shall evaluate appropriate cases to determine if a diversion grant would be effective in meeting a family's immediate and compelling need and prevent the family from going on temporary assistance or to assist the family in leaving temporary assistance. The diversion grant shall be awarded pursuant to the requirements in subsections (b) and (c) and the rules of the department.

The diversion grant:

Shall meet immediate needs so that an applicant or recipient can avoid temporary cash assistance;

May be granted as the department considers appropriate;

May not cover the same type of immediate need met by a previous diversion grant unless the department determines that the current immediate need is a new and verified emergency;

May range from one (1) to twelve (12) months of temporary cash assistance, dependent upon the department's determination that there is a compelling need for a diversion grant;

Shall be calculated based upon the amount of temporary cash assistance an applicant is eligible to receive under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families/Families First program; and

May not duplicate periods of temporary cash assistance.

The applicant's temporary assistance eligibility period will be reduced by the number of months the applicant receives a diversion grant.

Acts 2014, ch. 787, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 787, § 2 provided that the commissioner of human services is authorized to promulgate rules to implement the diversion grant program in accord with title 4, chapter 5.

71-3-110. Distribution system.

The commissioner of human services has the authority to establish a system for distribution of any benefits provided by this part, or under the continued provisions of federal law and regulations as provided under §71-3-108, by means of electronic benefits transfer system and to contract with public or private entities to provide any services necessary to carry out such provision as the commissioner shall determine is appropriate.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 11; T.C.A., §71-3-160; Acts 2013, ch. 402, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-160 was transferred to §71-3-110 by the code commission in 2012.

71-3-111. Training and supervision.

The department shall appropriately train and supervise all employees and other persons who are responsible for developing, evaluating and managing personal responsibility plans for recipients of temporary assistance. Such training and supervision shall include, but not be limited to, a competency based case management program to measure the effectiveness of each plan and to provide appropriate oversight and implementation.

Any necessary part-time or temporary job counseling and job placement personnel shall be employed as provided by law.

Any additional full-time positions required by the various departments involved in the implementation of this part and of chapter 5, part 12 of this title shall be employed as provided by law.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 29; T.C.A., §71-3-161.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-161 was transferred to §71-3-111 by the code commission in 2012.

71-3-112 — 71-3-114. [Reserved.]

Any individual development accounts or other such accounts established for the benefit of recipients under this part or related programs shall be administered as approved by the state treasurer, who shall prescribe investment procedures for the corpus of such funds in a manner that the state treasurer determines in consultation with the commissioners of human services and finance and administration; provided, that the interest accruing from such accounts shall remain in those accounts and shall be distributed to the recipients, on an equitable basis, in the manner determined by the state treasurer in consultation with the commissioners.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 34; T.C.A., §71-3-165.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-165 was transferred to §71-3-115 by the code commission in 2012.

71-3-116. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 1; T.C.A., §71-3-166.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-166 was transferred to §71-3-116 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.

71-3-117. Amendment of provisions.

All assistance granted under this part shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to any amending or repealing statute that may hereafter be passed, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of such recipient's assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing statute.

Acts 1937, ch. 50, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.54 (Williams, § 4765.53); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-317, 14-8-117.

71-3-118. Charging for assistance to applicants unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation either to charge or to receive, directly or indirectly, anything of value for assisting any person in making application to the proper authorities of this state, or any of them, for relief or assistance under any statutes of this state providing for financial assistance to dependent children.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1937, ch. 118, § 1; 1941, ch. 41, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.56 (Williams, § 4765.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-318, 14-8-118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-3-119. Use of lists of recipients.

Except as permitted by §§ 71-1-117 and 71-1-118, it is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this part, to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, authorize or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any list or names of, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving aid and services to needy families with children, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the department or divisions of the department, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1941, ch. 148, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.56 (Williams, § 11412.7); impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1963, ch. 129, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-319, 14-8-119; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-3-120. Fraudulent receipt of temporary assistance — Penalties — Statute of limitations.

A person commits an offense who, knowingly, obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids, or abets any person to obtain, by means of a willfully false statement, representation, or impersonation, or by any other fraudulent means or in any manner not authorized by this part, or by the regulations or procedures issued or implemented by the department of human services pursuant to this part, temporary assistance for a dependent child as provided pursuant to this part, either by check or by an electronic benefits transfer process, or any assistance provided pursuant to this part by any other means as determined by the department, to which such child is not entitled or in an amount greater than that to which such child is entitled.

A person commits an offense who, knowingly, in any manner not authorized by this part or the regulations or procedures implemented by the department of human services pursuant to this part, presents for payment, or causes to be presented for payment, transfers, exchanges, sells, or otherwise uses, or aids or abets any person to present for payment, transfer, exchange, sell, or otherwise use any temporary assistance check, or any electronic benefits card, authorization or personal identification number, device or other thing or means issued or utilized for the purpose of providing temporary assistance benefits pursuant to this part electronically or otherwise.

A person who receives a temporary assistance check or any electronic benefits card, authorization or personal identification number, device or other thing or means issued or utilized for the purpose of providing temporary assistance benefits electronically or otherwise, knowing them to have been presented for payment, transferred, exchanged, sold or otherwise used in any manner not authorized by this part or the regulations or procedures implemented by the department of human services pursuant to this part, commits an offense.

An offense under this section is a Class E felony if the value of such temporary assistance sought to be obtained, or that is obtained, is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, and upon conviction of the offense, such person shall be sentenced for such offense as provided by law, or shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both; and, if such temporary assistance sought to be obtained, or that is obtained, is of a value less than one hundred dollars ($100), such person commits a Class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced or fined, or both, as provided by law.

In addition to or in lieu of any of the penalties in subsection (d), the court may order that such person be disqualified from participation in the temporary assistance program for twelve (12) months for the first offense, twenty-four (24) months for the second offense, and permanently for the third offense. Disqualification pursuant to this section of any person from eligibility for assistance under this part shall not operate to disqualify or suspend the eligibility of an innocent adult or child of the disqualified person's family.

The department shall enclose a copy of the penalties provided in this section one (1) time, in notice form, to each recipient of assistance pursuant to this part and post a notice to such effect in noticeable places in each of its assistance offices.

In addition to any of the penalties in subsection (d), any person convicted of any offense specified in subsection (a), (b) or (c) shall be ordered to make restitution in the total amount found to be the value of the temporary assistance that forms the basis for the conviction. In the event any person ordered to make restitution pursuant to this section is found to be indigent and, therefore, unable to make restitution in full at the time of conviction, the court shall order a periodic payment plan consistent with the person's financial ability.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, prosecutions for any of the offenses specified in subsection (a), (b) or (c) shall be commenced within four (4) years next after the commission of the offense. For purposes of this subsection (h), any such offense that is based upon a willful failure to report information as required by law is considered a continuing offense until such information is reported.

Acts 1937, ch. 50, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.53 (Williams, § 4765.52); Acts 1955, ch. 28, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-320, 14-8-120; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 104; 1999, ch. 248, § 1.

Cross-References. Fraudulent receipt of food assistance, penalties and statute of limitations, §71-5-314.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-3-121. Transfer of benefits — Exemption.

Assistance granted under this part shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this part shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Acts 1937, ch. 50, § 16-a, as added by Acts 1941, ch. 37, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.55 (Williams, § 4765.53a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-321, 14-8-121.

Law Reviews.

A Comparison of Classification and Treatment of Family Support Obligations and Student Loans: A Case Analysis (William Houston Brown and Katherine L. Evans), 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 623 (1994).

Exempt Property in Tennessee under the Bankruptcy Code (Thomas E. Ray), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 7 (1982).

71-3-122. Prosecution of deserting spouse or parent.

Whenever any dependent spouse or dependent child shall make an application to the county office of the department for an aid and services to needy families with children grant, and an investigation of the circumstances of the applicant reveals that the applicant was put in such needy circumstances by reason of the fact that the dependent spouse was deserted or abandoned by that spouse's or the child's parent, then it shall be the duty of the county office to notify the chief counsel of the department, whose duty it shall be to certify such fact to the prosecuting attorney of the county, who shall institute the necessary criminal proceedings against the spouse or parent who has deserted the dependent spouse or family.

Acts 1951, ch. 257, § 1 (Williams, § 4765.53b); 1963, ch. 129, § 1; 1976, ch. 754, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-322, 14-8-122.

Cross-References. Failure to provide for child, misdemeanor, §39-15-101.

Failure to support disabled spouse, misdemeanor, §39-15-101.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

71-3-123. Civil action against deserting spouse or parent.

All payments made by the department to such spouse or dependent child shall be recoverable against the deserting spouse or parents by the state as a debt due to the state, and such recovered payments shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the aid and services to needy families with children fund.

In the event the deserting spouse or parent has left the state, then the secretary of state shall be the lawful attorney or agent for such spouse or parent and service of process shall be made by serving a copy of the process on the secretary of state, and such service shall be sufficient service upon the spouse or parent; provided, that notice of such service and a copy of the process are forthwith sent by registered mail by the prosecuting attorney to the last known out-of-state address of the spouse or parent.

The property of the spouse or parent within the state shall be subject to execution for payment of any judgment taken against such spouse or parent.

Acts 1951, ch. 257, § 2 (Williams, § 4765.53c); 1963, ch. 129, § 1; 1976, ch. 754, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-323, 14-8-123.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451.

71-3-124. Assignment of support rights to state — Enforcement and collection of rights — Collection service fee — Attorneys — Caretaker relative eligibility — Standing to petition.

Each applicant or recipient who receives or authorizes payment of public or temporary assistance pursuant to Title IV-A or IV-E of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.), respectively, or any successor program providing temporary assistance or foster care or adoption assistance shall be deemed to have assigned to the state any rights to support from any other person such applicant or recipient may have:

In the applicant's own behalf or in behalf of any other family member for whom the applicant is applying for or receiving aid; and

That have accrued at the time such assignment is executed.

Each payment shall constitute “receipt” for purposes of determining when the assignment is executed.

During the terms of such assignment, the department shall be subrogated to the rights of the child or children or the person having custody to collect and receive all child support payments.

The department has the right to initiate any support action in its own name or in the name of the recipient under existing laws of this state and to recover any payments ordered by the courts of this or any other state.

In the exercise of its subrogation rights, the department shall give the person having custody prior notice of any action taken to enforce or modify support and shall inform the custodian of the right to intervene to protect any future interest; provided, that failure to provide such notice shall not be a defense to the obligor in any proceeding.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, neither the department of human services, nor any Title IV-D child support contractor of the department, nor any recipient of public assistance in this or any other state or territory, shall be required to demonstrate to a court or administrative tribunal in this state that the caretaker of the child for whom child support is sought is vested with any more than physical custody of the child or children in order to have standing to petition for child support from the legal parent of the child or children for whom support is sought, or to seek enforcement or modification of any existing orders involving such child or children.

Legal custody of a child to whom a child support obligation is owed shall not be a prerequisite to the initiation of any support action or to the enforcement or modification of any support obligation, whether or not the obligation has been assigned to this state or any other state or territory by operation of law.

The department shall certify to the clerks of the appropriate state courts that an assignment of any and all rights, title and interest in support rights has been made to this state by a public assistance or temporary assistance recipient of this state. The department may also, in its discretion, certify to the clerk of the appropriate court in this state that a recipient of public assistance or temporary assistance in another state has assigned support rights to that state pursuant to federal law. Upon receipt of this certification, the clerks of the appropriate state courts shall transmit support payments that they receive on behalf of such public assistance or temporary assistance recipient. The clerk shall transmit the amount directly to the agency specified by the department in accordance with § 36-5-101. The clerks are to identify these payments by the names of the parties involved in the cause of action and by the docket number of the cause of action. These support payments shall be transmitted to the department or the specified agency continuously until the department notifies the clerks of the appropriate state courts that it is no longer necessary to do so. The department shall send to each recipient notice of payments received in such recipient's behalf quarterly.

Upon the filing of an application by an individual not otherwise eligible for support services under this section, the department may initiate support actions for an individual, in accordance with Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), as amended.

The department or any entity, public or private, that contracts with the department to establish paternity or to establish, modify or enforce child or spousal support pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act shall have authority and standing to file any legal actions to establish paternity or to establish, modify or enforce child or spousal support in any judicial or administrative proceeding on behalf of the department and the state for persons who have assigned rights of support to the department pursuant to this section, or who have otherwise applied for child or spousal support services pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) or Title IV-D of the Social Security Act. The department or its contractors may file such legal actions without the necessity of intervening in an existing action or naming the state as a party to the action. The department or its contractors shall not be required to provide proof that the obligor, the obligee or the child has applied for or is receiving Title IV-D child support services in order to meet the requirements for conducting Title IV-D child support judicial or administrative actions.

The provision of services under a child support enforcement program that includes services by an attorney or an attorney's representative employed by, under contract to, or representing the department shall not create an attorney-client relationship with any party other than the state. Attorneys employed by or under contract to the department shall have an affirmative duty to notify individuals applying for child support services or temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) recipients or recipients of any successor program providing temporary assistance whose rights to support have been assigned, who contact or are contacted by the attorney or other child support enforcement program staff that any legal services provided by the child support enforcement program are solely on behalf of the state, and that no incidents of the lawyer-client relationship, including the confidentiality of lawyer-client communications, exist between the attorney and the applicant or recipient. No such duty shall exist when the applicant for services is another governmental agency acting on behalf of an individual and there is no direct contact between the child support enforcement program and the individual seeking support.

As a condition of eligibility for consideration of the caretaker relative in the request for assistance under the TANF program or any successor program providing temporary assistance, each applicant for or recipient of benefits under this program shall cooperate, unless good cause not to cooperate is shown to exist in accordance with 45 Code of Federal Regulations, Sections 232.40 through 232.49 as they may be amended, with the department and its Title IV-D contractors in:

Identifying and locating the parent of a child for whom aid is claimed;

Establishing the paternity of a child born out of wedlock for whom aid is claimed;

Obtaining support payments for the applicant or recipient and for a child for whom aid is claimed; and

Obtaining any other payments or property due the applicant or recipient of the child.

Cooperation with the department and its Title IV-D contractors shall be defined by the department in rules that are consistent with federal regulations.

If a caretaker relative fails to cooperate with the department or its Title IV-D contractors under subdivision (e)(1), the department shall, consistent with federal regulations, deny assistance to that caretaker relative of a child or children who are otherwise eligible for TANF or any successor program providing temporary assistance and it shall, consistent with federal regulations, provide assistance to the eligible child in the form of a protective payment, but such assistance will be determined without regard to the needs of the caretaker relative.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules to carry out this section.

Acts 1977, ch. 110, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-324; Acts 1982, ch. 764, § 1; 1985, ch. 477, §§ 9, 10; 1986, ch. 890, § 15; T.C.A., §14-8-124; Acts 1988, ch. 938, § 3; 1994, ch. 987, § 16; 1996, ch. 950, § 28; 1998, ch. 1098, § 68; 2000, ch. 922, § 38.

Code Commission Notes.

Former references to “aid to families with dependent children (AFDC)” were deleted as obsolete by the code commission and were changed to “temporary assistance for needy families (TANF)” in 2004.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to issue income assignment orders against child support obligors, OAG 99-008, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/25/99).

Title IV-D child support enforcement: welfare eligibility, custody and privilege issues, OAG 00-027, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (2/18/00).

An indigent defendant in an action to enforce a child support obligation through contempt of court proceedings has a right to counsel if the defendant is in jeopardy of incarceration, OAG 04-142, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (9/01/04).

Neither the Department of Human Services or its contractors that provide child support enforcement services have an attorney-client relationship with the individuals who apply for or who receive such services, OAG 07-149, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 149 (11/1/07).

71-3-125. Child support enforcement by district attorneys general.

The district attorneys general have the authority, within budgetary limitations, to establish child support enforcement programs within their judicial districts.

Such authority includes:

The hiring of clerical and professional staffs;

The entering into contracts with other agencies; and

Such other authority as may be necessary to carry out the requirements of the child support enforcement programs under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.).

Any legal services furnished under the authority of this section shall be solely on behalf of the state, and shall not create an attorney-client relationship with any party other than the state.

Acts 1977, ch. 235, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-325, 14-8-125; Acts 1988, ch. 938, § 4.

Cross-References. Legal support in child support enforcement programs, §71-3-124.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451.

71-3-126. Restrictions on use of electronic benefits transfer cards by TANF recipients — Reimbursement — Violations and penalties — System for review — Right to hearing — Rules and regulations — Revenues and fines deposited in general fund.

For the purposes of this section, the term “public assistance benefits” means money or property provided directly or indirectly to eligible persons through the temporary assistance to needy families program.

A recipient of public assistance benefits shall not knowingly use an electronic benefits transfer card in:

A liquor store as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(12)(B)(i);

A casino, gambling casino, or gaming establishment as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(12)(B)(ii);

An adult cabaret as defined in § 7-51-1102; or

A retail store licensed to do business in this state that derives its largest category of sales from the sale of loose tobacco, cigars, cigarettes, pipes, and other smoking accessories.

To the extent permitted by federal law, any person who violates this subsection (b) shall reimburse the department for the purchase.

The department shall notify all recipients of electronic benefit cards of the prohibitions set forth in subdivision (b)(1) and the penalties under current law for knowingly using an EBT card in any prohibited business location.

A person or business entity, or any agent or employee of the person or business entity shall not knowingly accept public assistance benefits from an electronic benefits transfer card for the purchase of any goods or services in:

A liquor store as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(12)(B)(i);

A casino, gambling casino, or gaming establishment as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(12)(B)(ii);

An adult cabaret as defined in § 7-51-1102; or

A retail store licensed to do business in this state that derives its largest category of sales from the sale of loose tobacco, cigars, cigarettes, pipes, and other smoking accessories.

Any person or business entity who knowingly violates this subsection (c) shall be subject to the following civil penalties:

One thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first violation;

Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the second violation within five (5) years;

Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a third or a subsequent violation within five (5) years. The district attorney general may bring an action to suspend the business licenses and permits of the person or business entity for one (1) year for any violation under this subsection (c). The department is authorized to bring an action to enforce any civil penalty under this subsection (c) in a complaint filed in the chancery court of the county where the merchant is located.

A recipient of public assistance benefits shall not knowingly use an electronic benefit transfer card in an automated teller machine or point-of-sale device located in:

A liquor store as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(12)(B)(i);

A casino, gambling casino, or gaming establishment as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(12)(B)(ii); or

An adult cabaret as defined in § 7-51-1102.

Any person who knowingly violates this subsection (d) shall reimburse the department for the amount withdrawn and used subject to any prohibition in federal law. Upon a third or subsequent violation, if permitted by federal law, the person shall be permanently disqualified from receiving public assistance benefits by means of direct cash payment or an electronic benefits transfer access card.

The department of human services shall establish a system for reviewing electronic benefit transactions of recipients pursuant to this section on such basis as the commissioner may determine, but not less than on a quarterly basis.

A person or entity subject to a penalty or sanction under this section shall have the right to a hearing pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner of human services is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations, including emergency rules, to effectuate the purposes of this section. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The department shall add by rule to the prohibited use of an electronic benefits transfer card other purchases to the fullest extent later permitted by federal law.

Any revenues deposited or civil fines collected pursuant to subsection (c) shall be deposited into the general fund.

Acts 2013, ch. 312, § 1; 2015, ch. 392, §§ 1-3.